Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1080.
do enact as follows:AB1080,11Section 1. 101.122 of the statutes is created to read:AB1080,2,22101.122 Trampoline park safety. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1080,2,53(a) “Commercial trampoline” means a device that incorporates a trampoline 4bed and is used for recreational jumping, springing, bouncing, acrobatics, or 5gymnastics in a trampoline park.AB1080,2,96(b) “Emergency response plan” means a written plan of action for the 7reasonable and appropriate contact, deployment, and coordination of services, 8agencies, and personnel to provide the earliest possible response to an injury or 9emergency.AB1080,2,1110(c) “Operator” means a person that owns, manages, or controls or that has the 11duty to manage or control the operation of a trampoline park.AB1080,2,1212(d) “Participant” means an individual who uses a trampoline park.AB1080,2,1413(e) “Trampoline bed” means the flexible surface of a trampoline on which a 14user jumps or bounces.AB1080,2,1615(f) “Trampoline court” means an area of a trampoline park comprising either 16of the following:AB1080,2,17171. Multiple commercial trampolines.AB1080,3,212. At least one commercial trampoline and at least one associated foam or 2inflatable bag pit.AB1080,3,43(g) “Trampoline park” means a place of business that offers the recreational 4use of a trampoline court for a fee.AB1080,3,95(2) License required. (a) Except as provided in sub. (3), no person may 6operate a trampoline park without holding an annual license issued by the 7department. Subject to ss. 440.12 and 440.13, the department shall issue or renew 8a license if the applicant pays the fee required under s. 101.19 (1g) (ar) and submits 9a copy of the certificate of insurance required under sub. (4).AB1080,3,1110(b) The department shall promulgate rules establishing requirements and 11procedures for applying for annual licenses issued or renewed under par. (a).AB1080,3,1212(3) Exemptions. This section does not apply to any of the following:AB1080,3,1413(a) A playground operated by a school, city, village, town, or county that 14satisfies all of the following:AB1080,3,16151. The playground is an incidental amenity of the school, city, village, town, or 16county.AB1080,3,18172. The school, city, village, town, or county does not primarily derive revenue 18from operating the playground for a fee.AB1080,3,2019(b) A gymnastics, dance, cheer, or tumbling facility that satisfies any of the 20following:AB1080,3,22211. The majority of activities at the facility are based in training or rehearsal 22and not recreation.AB1080,4,212. The facility derives at least 80 percent of revenue through supervised 2instruction or classes.AB1080,4,433. The student-coach or student-instructor ratio is based on age, skill level, 4and number of students.AB1080,4,65(c) An inflatable ride, an inflatable bounce house, or equipment used 6exclusively for exercise.AB1080,4,77(4) Insurance. An operator shall do all of the following:AB1080,4,118(a) Maintain insurance providing liability coverage of at least $1,000,000 in 9the aggregate and $500,000 per incident to cover injuries to participants arising out 10of any negligence or misconduct by the operator or the trampoline park’s staff in the 11construction, maintenance, or operation of the trampoline park.AB1080,4,1312(b) Maintain a certificate of insurance demonstrating compliance with par. 13(a).AB1080,4,1514(c) Notify the department within 24 hours of the lapse, expiration, or 15cancellation of the insurance required under par. (a).AB1080,4,1816(5) Violation; license suspension or revocation. (a) Except as provided 17in par. (b), a violation of this section is grounds for the department to suspend or 18revoke a license issued or renewed under sub. (2) (a).AB1080,4,2319(b) The department may suspend or revoke a license only if the department 20gives the operator at least 60 days before the suspension or revocation an 21opportunity to cure the violation, except no opportunity to cure is required for a 22repeat violation. The department shall promulgate rules specifying the timeline 23and process for curing a violation.AB1080,5,21(6) Compliance with industry standards. An operator shall do all of the 2following:AB1080,5,43(a) Ensure that the trampoline park complies with industry standards 4regarding all of the following:AB1080,5,651. Signage and notification for proper use of the trampoline park, safety 6procedures, and education of risk.AB1080,5,872. Equipment and facilities, including materials, layout, condition, and 8maintenance.AB1080,5,993. Staff training, including safety procedures and emergency response.AB1080,5,10104. Participant activities and behaviors that should be restricted.AB1080,5,12115. Separation of participants within the trampoline park based on age, size, or 12other necessary factors.AB1080,5,14136. Operational issues, including maintenance, injury logs, and emergency 14response plans.AB1080,5,15157. Staff supervision and monitoring of activities.AB1080,5,17168. Statistical tracking of injuries in a manner that does not personally identify 17the injured participant.AB1080,5,1918(b) Notify the department within 48 hours of any changes in status regarding 19compliance required under par. (a). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1080 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1080 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1080 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1080 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1080: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting